California statutes. Vehicle Code
(c) No ordinance or resolution shall be enacted without a public hearing thereon and 10 days’ prior written notice to all owners of the roads within a mobilehome park or manufactured housing community proposed to be subject to the ordinance or resolution. At least seven days prior to the public hearing, the owner or manager of the mobilehome park or manufactured housing community shall post a written notice about the hearing in a conspicuous area in the park or community clubhouse, or if no clubhouse exists, in a conspicuous public place in the park or community.

(d) For purposes of this section, the prima facie speed limit on any road within a mobilehome park or manufactured housing community shall be 15 miles per hour. This section does not preclude a mobilehome park or manufactured housing community from requesting a higher or lower speed limit if an engineering and traffic survey has been conducted within the community supporting that request.

(e) The department is not required to provide patrol or enforce any provision of this code on any privately owned and maintained road within a mobilehome park or manufactured housing community, except those provisions applicable to private property other than by action under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 284, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21108.

Local authorities may adopt rules and regulations by ordinance or resolution regulating vehicular traffic on privately owned and maintained roads or ways within the boundaries of a privately owned airport, when the roads or ways are expressly open to the general public for purposes of vehicular traffic.

The rules or regulations shall not be effective until appropriate signs giving notice thereof are posted along the roads or ways affected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

21109.

(a) Local authorities may adopt rules and regulations by ordinance or resolution regulating vehicular and pedestrian traffic in subways, tubes, and tunnels or upon bridges or viaducts.

(b) The proposed ordinance or resolution shall not be effective as to any state highway until approved in writing by the Department of Transportation. The Department of Transportation, in considering any proposed ordinance or resolution to prohibit or restrict the use by cargo tank vehicles displaying flammable liquids placards in tunnels of a length of 300 feet or greater, shall consult with the Department of the California Highway Patrol and hold a public hearing as provided in Section 21109.5 of the Vehicle Code. In evaluating the feasibility of prohibiting or restricting the use of the structure by cargo tank vehicles displaying flammable liquids placards, the Department of Transportation shall conduct a traffic and engineering survey which includes an analysis of the relative risks to public safety in determining the feasibility of reasonable alternative routes.

(c) The rules or regulations shall not be effective until appropriate signs have been posted giving notice thereof to drivers and pedestrians approaching the highway structures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1255, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

21109.5.

(a) No restriction or prohibition shall be effective pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 21109 or Section 34020.5 except upon notice and hearing in the manner prescribed in this section.

(b) Notice of hearing shall be published pursuant to Section 6064 of the Government Code. The notice shall advise all interested parties that they may submit written or oral objections to the proposed action and shall designate a time and place for presentation of the objections. The time for submission of objections shall not expire, and the hearings shall not be held, less than 60 days after the first publication of notice. The hearing shall be conducted by the Department of Transportation and interested parties shall be accorded an adequate opportunity to be heard with respect to their objections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1255, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

21110.

Local authorities may adopt rules and regulations by ordinance or resolution to require that all vehicles stop before entering or crossing the tracks at any highway railroad grade crossing when signs are in place giving notice thereof, but no such ordinance shall be effective unless approved by an order of the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

21111.

Local authorities may adopt rules and regulations by ordinance or resolution regulating vehicular traffic on privately owned and maintained roads or ways within the boundaries of any housing project or within the site of any housing owned or operated by a housing authority created under and by virtue of the Housing Authorities Law, commencing at Section 34200 of the Health and Safety Code, on privately owned and maintained roads or ways within areas which would be a residence district if the road or way were a public highway, or, with the consent of the owner, on publicly owned and maintained roads and ways within areas which are not owned by such local authorities. The rules or regulations shall not be effective until appropriate signs giving notice thereof are posted along the roads or ways affected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

21112.

Local authorities may by ordinance license and regulate the location of stands on streets and highways for use by taxicabs and other public carriers for hire in their respective jurisdictions. No such ordinance shall be effective as to any state highway until approved in writing by the Department of Transportation. Where maintenance of any state highway is delegated by such department to a city, such approval is not required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

21113.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a person shall not drive a vehicle or animal, or stop, park, or leave standing a vehicle or animal, whether attended or unattended, upon the driveways, paths, parking facilities, or the grounds of any of the following:

 (A) A public school, state university, state college, or an educational institution exempted, in whole or in part, from taxation.

(B) A unit of the state park system.

(C) A county park.

(D) A municipal airport.

(E) A rapid transit district, transit development board, transit district, public transportation agency, county transportation commission created pursuant to Section 130050 of the Public Utilities Code, or a joint powers agency operating or managing a commuter rail system.

(F) Any property under the direct control of the legislative body of a municipality.

(G) A state, county, or hospital district institution or building.

(H) Any harbor improvement district or harbor district formed pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 5800) or Part 3 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 8 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(I) A district organized pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 27000) of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(J) State grounds served by the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(K) Any property under the possession or control of a housing authority formed pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 34240) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The activities described in paragraph (1) may be performed with the permission of, and upon and subject to any condition or regulation that may be imposed by, the legislative body of the municipality, or the governing board or officer of the public
 school, state university, state college, county park, municipal airport, rapid transit district, transit development board, transit district, public transportation agency, county transportation commission, joint powers agency operating or managing a commuter rail system, or state, county, or hospital district institution or building, or educational institution, or harbor district, or a district organized pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 27000) of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code, or housing authority, or the Director of Parks and Recreation regarding units of the state park system or the state agency with jurisdiction over the grounds served by the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(b) A governing board, legislative body, or officer shall erect or place appropriate signs giving notice of any special
 conditions or regulations that are imposed under this section and the governing board, legislative body, or officer shall also prepare and keep available at the principal administrative office of the governing board, legislative body, or officer, for examination by all interested persons, a written statement of all those special conditions and regulations adopted pursuant to this section.

(c) When a governing board, legislative body, or officer permits public traffic upon the driveways, paths, parking facilities, or grounds under their control then, except for those conditions imposed or regulations enacted by the governing board, legislative body, or officer applicable to the traffic, all the provisions of this code relating to traffic upon the highways shall be applicable to the traffic upon the driveways, paths, parking facilities, or
 grounds.

(d) A public transportation agency that imposes any condition or regulation upon a person who parks or leaves standing a vehicle, pursuant to subdivision (a), is authorized to do either of the following:

(1) Enforce that condition or regulation in the manner provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 40200) of Chapter 1 of Division 17 of this code. The public transportation agency shall be considered the issuing agency for that purpose.

(2) Designate regularly employed and salaried employees, who are engaged in directing traffic or enforcing parking laws and regulations, for the purpose of removing any vehicle in the same manner as a city, county, or jurisdiction of a state agency pursuant to Chapter
 10 (commencing with Section 22650) of Division 11 of this code.

(e) With respect to the permitted use of vehicles or animals on property under the direct control of the legislative body of a municipality, no change in the use of vehicles or animals on the property, that had been permitted on January 1, 1976, shall be effective unless and until the legislative body, at a meeting open to the general public, determines that the use of vehicles or animals on the property should be prohibited or regulated.

(f) A transit development board may adopt ordinances, rules, or regulations to restrict, or specify the conditions for, the use of bicycles, motorized bicycles, electric bicycles, skateboards, electrically motorized boards, and roller skates on property under the control of, or any
 portion of property used by, the board.

(g) A public agency, including, but not limited to, the Regents of the University of California and the Trustees of the California State University, may adopt rules or regulations to restrict, or specify the conditions for, the use of bicycles, motorized bicycles, electric bicycles, skateboards, electrically motorized boards, and roller skates on public property under the jurisdiction of that agency.

(h) “Housing authority,” for the purposes of this section, means a housing authority located within a county with a population of over 6,000,000 people, and any other housing authority that complies with the requirements of this section.

(i) “Public transportation agency,” for purposes of
 this section, means a public agency that provides public transportation as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 1 of Article XIXA of the California Constitution or a county transportation commission created pursuant to Section 130050 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 512, Sec. 2.   (AB 1943)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

21114.

If a local authority finds that a city street or county road under its jurisdiction adjacent to an airport has been specifically designed and constructed, with the prior approval of the local authority, so as to safely permit the use thereof by regular vehicular traffic and also the taxiing of aircraft thereon between the airport and the place where such aircraft are hangared or tied down, the local authority may by resolution or ordinance designate such street or road or portion thereof for such combined use and prescribe rules and regulations therefor which shall have the force of law. No such street or road shall be so designated for a distance of more than one-half mile from the airport, provided, the finding of the local authority in this respect shall be conclusive. Upon such designation becoming effective, it shall be the sole responsibility of the local authority to enforce the provisions of the Vehicle Code and all rules and regulations adopted by it upon such street or road. Upon such designation becoming effective it shall be lawful to taxi aircraft upon such street or road in accordance with the rules and regulations prescribed as aforesaid and said aircraft need not be licensed under this code or comply with other provisions thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 537.)
-------------------------------------------

21114.5.

Notwithstanding Section 21663 or any other provision of this code, local authorities may, by ordinance, authorize the operation of electric carts by physically disabled persons, by persons 50 years of age or older, or, while in the course of their employment, by employees of the United States Postal Service, state and local governmental agencies, or utility companies, on public sidewalks. Any ordinance shall, however, contain provisions requiring any disabled person or person 50 years of age or older who owns or leases an electric cart to apply to the local authority for a permit and an identification sticker to so operate the cart, and requiring the person to affix the sticker to the cart in order to operate it on the sidewalk. The permit and sticker shall become invalid if the person ceases to operate, own, or lease the cart.

This section does not apply to devices described in subdivision (b) of Section 415.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 124, Sec. 125.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

21115.

(a) If a local authority finds that a highway under its jurisdiction is located adjacent to, or provides access to, a golf course and between the golf course and the place where golf carts are parked or stored or is within or bounded by a real estate development offering golf facilities and is designed and constructed, so as to safely permit the use of regular vehicular traffic and also the driving of golf carts on the highway, the local authority may, by resolution or ordinance, designate the highway or portion of the highway for combined use and prescribe rules and regulations that shall have the force of law. No highway shall be so designated for a distance of more than one mile from the golf course if the highway is not located within a development or beyond the area of a development, provided, the finding of the local authority in this respect shall be conclusive. Upon the designation becoming effective it shall be lawful to drive golf carts upon the highway in accordance with the prescribed rules and regulations. The rules and regulations may establish crossing zones and speed limits and other operating standards but shall not require that the golf carts conform to any requirements of this code with respect to registration, licensing, or equipment, except that if operated during darkness the golf cart shall be subject to the provisions of Section 24001.5 regarding equipment.

The rules and regulations shall not be effective until appropriate signs giving notice thereof are posted along the highway affected.

A “real estate development offering golf facilities,” for purposes of this section, means an area of single-family or multiple-family residences, the owners or occupants of which are eligible for membership in, or the use of, one or more golf courses within the development by virtue of their ownership or occupancy of a residential dwelling unit in the development.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “golf cart” includes a low-speed vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 140, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

21115.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 21115, a local authority may, by ordinance or resolution, establish crossing zones, for use by golf carts at any time other than during darkness, on any street, other than a state highway, that has a posted speed limit of 45 miles per hour or less and that is immediately adjacent to a golf course. The crossing zones shall be at an angle of approximately 90 degrees to the direction of the roadway. The ordinance or resolution shall not become effective until submitted to the law enforcement agency having primary jurisdiction over the street, the law enforcement agency finds and determines that the conditions pertaining to that street, with the addition of proper signs, markers, or lighting, or any combination of those, will permit the establishment of a golf cart crossing with reasonable safety, and the signs, markers, or lighting specified by the law enforcement agency are in place.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not constitute precedent for the operation of golf carts on any street or highway other than in a crossing zone established pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) For purposes of this section, a “golf cart” includes a low-speed vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 140, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

21116.

(a) No person shall drive any motor vehicle upon a roadway located on a levee, canal bank, natural watercourse bank, or pipeline right-of-way if the responsibility for maintenance of the levee, canal bank, natural watercourse bank, or pipeline right-of-way is vested in the state or in a reclamation, levee, drainage, water or irrigation district, or other local agency, unless such person has received permission to drive upon such roadway from the agency responsible for such maintenance, or unless such roadway has been dedicated as a public right-of-way.

(b) For this section to be applicable to a particular levee, canal bank, natural watercourse bank, or pipeline right-of-way, the state or other agency having responsibility for maintenance of the levee, canal bank, natural watercourse bank, or pipeline right-of-way shall erect or place appropriate signs giving notice that permission is required to be obtained to drive a motor vehicle thereon and giving notice of any special conditions or regulations that are imposed pursuant to this section and shall prepare and keep available at the principal office of the state agency or other agency affected or of the board of such agency, for examination by all interested persons, a written statement, in conformity with the existing rights of such agency to control access to the roadway, describing the nature of the vehicles, if any, to which such permission might be granted and the conditions, regulations, and procedure for the acquisition of such permission adopted pursuant to this section.

(c) Nothing in this section prohibits the establishment of bicycle paths or routes (as prescribed by Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 5078) of Chapter 1 of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code) on levees, canal banks, natural watercourse banks, or pipeline rights-of-way.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1361.)
-------------------------------------------

21117.

(a) Local authorities may, notwithstanding Section 21101 or 21101.6, by written agreement approved by their legislative bodies, transfer among themselves the responsibility for maintaining, operating, or controlling public access to any highway under their respective jurisdictions located in or adjacent to an ecological reserve or an environmentally sensitive area within their respective jurisdictions. 

(b) An agreement entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) may authorize the local authority having responsibility for the highway under the agreement to do all of the following: 

(1) Limit access by motor vehicles to the highway during certain hours of the day or certain days of the week. 

(2) Prohibit access by motor vehicles during certain hours of the day or certain days of the week. 

(3) Provide for the construction or erection of barricades or other devices designed or intended to separate pedestrians from vehicles or motor vehicles.

(4) Establish and operate a program by which vehicular access is permitted only in conjunction with specified educational programs or for disabled persons, or both. 

(5) Issue temporary permits for special events valid for less than one day. 

(c) As used in this section, the term “ecological reserve” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1584 of the Fish and Game Code, and “environmentally sensitive area” has the same meaning as defined in Section 30107.5 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 541, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21118.

(a) A local authority may adopt rules and regulations by ordinance or resolution to restrict the routes or streets upon which a tour bus described in subdivision (b) of Section 612 may be operated, if the local authority determines that it is unsafe to operate those vehicles on those routes or streets.

(b) A local
 authority may adopt rules and regulations by ordinance or resolution to prohibit the use of loudspeakers or public address systems by a tour bus described in subdivision (b) of Section 612, and instead require the use of headphones or similar devices by passengers for any information or presentation provided for the passengers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   (AB 25)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Operation of Bicycles [21200. - 21214.7.]

21200.

(a) (1) A person riding a bicycle or operating a pedicab upon a highway has all the rights and is subject to all the provisions applicable to the driver of a vehicle by this division, including, but not limited to, provisions concerning driving under the influence of alcoholic beverages or drugs, and by Division 10 (commencing with Section 20000), Section 27400, Division 16.7 (commencing with Section 39000), Division 17 (commencing with Section 40000.1), and Division 18 (commencing with Section 42000), except those provisions which by their very nature can have no application.

(2) A person operating a bicycle on a Class I bikeway, as defined in subdivision
 (a) of Section 890.4 of the Streets and Highways Code, has all the rights and is subject to all the provisions applicable to the driver of a vehicle pursuant to Section 20001, except those provisions which by their very nature can have no application.

(b) (1) A peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, operating a bicycle during the course of his or her duties is exempt from the requirements of subdivision (a), except as those requirements relate to driving under the influence of alcoholic beverages or drugs, if the bicycle is being operated under any of the following circumstances:

(A) In response
 to an emergency call.

(B) While engaged in rescue operations.

(C) In the immediate pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the law.

(2) This subdivision does not relieve a peace officer from the duty to operate a bicycle with due regard for the safety of all persons using the highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 139, Sec. 1.   (AB 1755)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

21200.5.

Notwithstanding Section 21200, it is unlawful for any person to ride a bicycle upon a highway while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage or any drug, or under the combined influence of an alcoholic beverage and any drug. Any person arrested for a violation of this section may request to have a chemical test made of the person’s blood, breath, or urine for the purpose of determining the alcoholic or drug content of that person’s blood pursuant to Section 23612, and, if so requested, the arresting officer shall have the test performed. A conviction of a violation of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250). Violations of this section are subject to Section 13202.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 22, Sec. 17.   Effective May 26, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

21201.

(a) A person shall not operate a bicycle on a roadway unless it is equipped with a brake that will enable the operator to make one braked wheel skid on dry, level, clean pavement.

(b) A person shall not operate on the highway a bicycle equipped with handlebars so raised that the operator must elevate their hands above the level of their shoulders in order to grasp the normal steering grip area.

(c) A person shall not operate upon a highway a bicycle that is of a size that prevents the operator from safely stopping the bicycle, supporting it in an upright position with at least one foot on the ground, and restarting it in a safe manner.

(d) A bicycle operated during darkness on a highway, a sidewalk where bicycle operation is not prohibited by the local jurisdiction, or a bikeway, as defined in Section 890.4 of the Streets and Highways Code, shall be equipped with all of the following:

(1) A lamp emitting a white light that, while the bicycle is in motion, illuminates the highway, sidewalk, or bikeway in front of the bicyclist and is visible from a distance of 300 feet in front and from the sides of the bicycle.

(2) A red reflector or a solid or flashing red light with a built-in reflector on the rear that shall be visible from a distance of 500 feet to the rear when directly in front of lawful upper beams of headlamps on a motor vehicle.

(3) A white or yellow reflector on each pedal, shoe, or ankle visible from the front and rear of
 the bicycle from a distance of 200 feet.

(4) A white or yellow reflector on each side forward of the center of the bicycle, and a white or red reflector on each side to the rear of the center of the bicycle, except that bicycles that are equipped with reflectorized tires on the front and the rear need not be equipped with these side reflectors.

The reflectors and reflectorized tires shall be of a type meeting requirements established by the department.

(e) A lamp or lamp combination, emitting a white light, attached to the operator and visible from a distance of 300 feet in front and from the sides of the bicycle, may be used in lieu of the lamp required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (d).

(f) An electric bicycle shall comply with paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) during all
 hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 36, Sec. 1.   (AB 544)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

21201.3.

(a) A bicycle or motorized bicycle used by a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.1 of, subdivision (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), or (i) of Section 830.2 of, subdivision (b) or (d) of Section 830.31 of, subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 830.32 of, Section 830.33 of, subdivision (a) of Section 830.36 of, subdivision (a) of Section 830.4 of, or Section 830.6 of, the Penal Code, in the performance of the peace officer’s duties, may display a steady or flashing blue warning light that is visible from the front, sides, or rear of the bicycle or motorized bicycle.

(b) No person shall display a steady or flashing blue warning light on a bicycle or motorized bicycle except as authorized under subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 877, Sec. 65.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

21201.5.

(a) No person shall sell, or offer for sale, a reflex reflector or reflectorized tire of a type required on a bicycle unless it meets requirements established by the department. If there exists a federal Consumer Product Safety Commission regulation applicable to bicycle reflectors, the provisions of that regulation shall prevail over provisions of this code or requirements established by the department pursuant to this code relative to bicycle reflectors.

(b) No person shall sell, or offer for sale, a new bicycle that is not equipped with a red reflector on the rear, a white or yellow reflector on each pedal visible from the front and rear of the bicycle, a white or yellow reflector on each side forward of the center of the bicycle, and a white or red reflector on each side to the rear of the center of the bicycle, except that bicycles which are equipped with reflectorized tires on the front and rear need not be equipped with these side reflectors.

(c) Area reflectorizing material meeting the requirements of Section 25500 may be used on a bicycle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 399, Sec. 2.   Effective July 11, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

21202.

(a) Any person operating a bicycle upon a roadway at a speed less than the normal speed of traffic moving in the same direction at that time shall ride as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of the roadway except under any of the following situations:

(1) When overtaking and passing another bicycle or vehicle proceeding in the same direction.

(2) When preparing for a left turn at an intersection or into a private road or driveway.

(3) When reasonably necessary to avoid conditions (including, but not limited to, fixed or moving objects, vehicles, bicycles, pedestrians, animals, surface hazards, or substandard width lanes) that make it unsafe to continue along the right-hand curb or edge, subject to the provisions of Section 21656. For purposes of this section, a “substandard width lane” is a lane that is too narrow for a bicycle and a vehicle to travel safely side by side within the lane.

(4) When approaching a place where a right turn is authorized.

(b) Any person operating a bicycle upon a roadway of a highway, which highway carries traffic in one direction only and has two or more marked traffic lanes, may ride as near the left-hand curb or edge of that roadway as practicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 674, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

21203.

No person riding upon any motorcycle, motorized bicycle, bicycle, coaster, roller skates, sled, or toy vehicle shall attach the same or himself to any streetcar or vehicle on the roadway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 813, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

21204.

(a) A person operating a bicycle upon a highway shall not ride other than upon or astride a permanent and regular seat attached thereto, unless the bicycle was designed by the manufacturer to be ridden without a seat.

(b) 
 An
 operator shall not allow a person riding as a passenger, and a person shall not ride as a passenger, on a bicycle upon a highway other than upon or astride a separate seat attached thereto. If the passenger is four years of age or younger, or weighs 40 pounds or less, the seat shall have adequate provision for retaining the passenger in place and for protecting the passenger from the moving parts of the bicycle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 594, Sec. 1.   (SB 527)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

21205.

No person operating a bicycle shall carry any package, bundle or article which prevents the operator from keeping at least one hand upon the handlebars.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 479.)
-------------------------------------------

21206.

This chapter does not prevent local authorities, by ordinance, from regulating the registration of bicycles and the parking and operation of bicycles on pedestrian or bicycle facilities, provided such regulation is not in conflict with the provisions of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 751.)
-------------------------------------------

21207.

(a) This chapter does not prohibit local authorities from establishing, by ordinance or resolution, bicycle lanes separated from any vehicular lanes upon highways, other than state highways as defined in Section 24 of the Streets and Highways Code and county highways established pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 1720) of Chapter 9 of Division 2 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(b) Bicycle lanes established pursuant to this section shall be constructed in compliance with Section 891 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 517, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21207.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 21207 and 23127 of this code, or any other law, a motorized bicycle shall not be operated on a bicycle path or trail, bikeway, bicycle lane established pursuant to Section 21207, equestrian trail, or hiking or recreational trail, unless it is within or adjacent to a roadway or unless the local authority or the governing body of a public agency having jurisdiction over the path or trail permits, by ordinance, that operation.

(b) The local authority or governing body of a public agency having jurisdiction over an equestrian trail, or hiking or recreational trail, may prohibit, by ordinance, the operation of an electric bicycle or any class of electric
 bicycle on that trail.

(c) The Department of Parks and Recreation may prohibit the operation of an electric bicycle or any class of electric bicycle on any bicycle path or trail within the department’s jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 343, Sec. 1.   (AB 1909)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21208.

(a) Whenever a bicycle lane has been established on a roadway pursuant to Section 21207, any person operating a bicycle upon the roadway at a speed less than the normal speed of traffic moving in the same direction at that time shall ride within the bicycle lane, except that the person may move out of the lane under any of the following situations:

(1) When overtaking and passing another bicycle, vehicle, or pedestrian within the lane or about to enter the lane if the overtaking and passing cannot be done safely within the lane.

(2) When preparing for a left turn at an intersection or into a private road or driveway.

(3) When reasonably necessary to leave the bicycle lane to avoid debris or other hazardous conditions.

(4) When approaching a place where a right turn is authorized.

(b) No person operating a bicycle shall leave a bicycle lane until the movement can be made with reasonable safety and then only after giving an appropriate signal in the manner provided in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 22100) in the event that any vehicle may be affected by the movement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 674, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

21209.

(a) No person shall drive a motor vehicle in a bicycle lane established on a roadway pursuant to Section 21207 except as follows:

(1) To park where parking is permitted.

(2) To enter or leave the roadway.

(3) To prepare for a turn within a distance of 200 feet from the intersection. 

(b) This section does not prohibit the use of a motorized bicycle in a bicycle lane, pursuant to Section 21207.5, at a speed no greater than is reasonable or prudent, having due regard for visibility, traffic conditions, and the condition of the roadway surface of the bicycle lane, and in a manner which does not endanger the safety of bicyclists.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 262, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21210.

No person shall leave a bicycle lying on its side on any sidewalk, or shall park a bicycle on a sidewalk in any other position, so that there is not an adequate path for pedestrian traffic. Local authorities may, by ordinance or resolution, prohibit bicycle parking in designated areas of the public highway, provided that appropriate signs are erected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 751.)
-------------------------------------------

21211.

(a) No person may stop, stand, sit, or loiter upon any class I bikeway, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 890.4 of the Streets and Highways Code, or any other public or private bicycle path or trail, if the stopping, standing, sitting, or loitering impedes or blocks the normal and reasonable movement of any bicyclist.

(b) No person may place or park any bicycle, vehicle, or any other object upon any bikeway or bicycle path or trail, as specified in subdivision (a), which impedes or blocks the normal and reasonable movement of any bicyclist unless the placement or parking is necessary for safe operation or is otherwise in compliance with the law.

(c) This section does not apply to drivers or owners of utility or public utility vehicles, as provided in Section 22512.

(d) This section does not apply to owners or drivers of vehicles who make brief stops while engaged in the delivery of newspapers to customers along the person’s route.

(e) This section does not apply to the driver or owner of a rubbish or garbage truck while actually engaged in the collection of rubbish or garbage within a business or residence district if the front turn signal lamps at each side of the vehicle are being flashed simultaneously and the rear turn signal lamps at each side of the vehicle are being flashed simultaneously.

(f) This section does not apply to the driver or owner of a tow vehicle while actually engaged in the towing of a vehicle if the front turn signal lamps at each side of the vehicle are being flashed simultaneously and the rear turn signal lamps at each side of the vehicle are being flashed simultaneously.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 127, Sec. 7.   Effective July 30, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

21212.

(a) A person under 18 years of age shall not operate a bicycle, a nonmotorized scooter, or a skateboard, wear in-line or roller skates, or ride upon a bicycle, nonmotorized scooter, or skateboard as a passenger upon a street, bikeway, as defined in Section 890.4 of the Streets and Highways Code, or any other public bicycle path or trail unless they are wearing a properly fitted and fastened bicycle helmet that meets the standards of either the American Society for Testing and Materials (ASTM) or the United States Consumer Product Safety Commission (CPSC), or a standard subsequently established by those entities. This requirement also applies to a person who rides upon a bicycle while in a restraining seat that is attached to the bicycle or in a trailer towed by the bicycle.

(b) A helmet sold or offered for sale for use by an operator or passenger of a bicycle, nonmotorized scooter, skateboard, or in-line or roller skates shall be conspicuously labeled in accordance with the standard described in subdivision (a), which shall constitute the manufacturer’s certification that the helmet conforms to the applicable safety standard.

(c) A person shall not sell or offer for sale, for use by an operator or passenger of a bicycle, nonmotorized scooter, skateboard, or in-line or roller skates, a helmet that is not of a type meeting requirements established by this section.
